District of Columbia statutes.
7-736.01

Grant authority.

(a)

For fiscal year 2010, the Director of the Department of Health shall have the authority to issue grants to qualified community organizations for the purposes of conducting health promotion, preventing disease, and providing health services; provided, that any grant in excess of $250,000 shall be awarded through a competitive process unless otherwise authorized under law.

(b)

The Department of Health shall submit a quarterly report to the Council on all grants issued pursuant to the authority granted in subsection (a) of this section.

(c)

For fiscal year 2014, the Director of the Department of Health shall have the authority to issue grants to:

(1)

Qualified community organizations for the purpose of providing the following services:

(A)

Ambulatory health services for an amount not to exceed $3,236,980;

(B)

Poison control hotline and prevention education services for an amount not to exceed $350,000;

(C)

Operations and primary care services for school-based health clinics for an amount not to exceed $2,250,000; and

(D)

Clinical nutritional home delivery services for individuals living with cancer and other life-threatening diseases; and

(2)

Organizations for the purpose of providing the following programs and services:

(A)

A teen pregnancy prevention program for an amount not to exceed $400,000;

(B)

Programs designed to promote healthy development in girls attending public and chartered schools in grades 9 through 12 located in areas of the city possessing the highest rates of teen pregnancy and highest enrollment in state-funded health programs in the District of Columbia, not to exceed $400,000;

(C)

Farmers market incentive programs, not to exceed $200,000;

(D)

Food-pantry services, not to exceed $52,000;

(E)

Wildlife rehabilitation services, not to exceed $250,000;

(F)

Mother-to-child (vertical) HIV transmission programs and services, not to exceed $50,000; and

(G)

Nonprofit organizations dedicated to preventing any of the following chronic diseases, not to exceed $850,000:

(i)

Asthma;

(ii)

Cancer;

(iii)

Diabetes;

(iv)

Hypertension;

(v)

Kidney disease; and

(vi)

Obesity.

(d)

(1)

All grants issued pursuant to subsection (c) of this section shall be administered pursuant to the requirements set forth in part B of subchapter XII-A of Chapter 3 of Title 1 [§ 1-328.11 et seq.].

(2)

The Department of Health shall submit a quarterly report to the Secretary to the Council on all grants issued pursuant to the authority granted in subsection (c) of this section and any grant in excess of $250,000 shall be awarded through a competitive process unless otherwise authorized by law.

(e)

(1)

Through Fiscal Year 2015, the Director of the Department of Health may issue grants totaling $ 1,550,000 to District of Columbia HIV prevention programs for a combination of HIV prevention interventions. These interventions shall include HIV screening in clinical and non-clinical settings and effective behavioral programs.

(2)

Through Fiscal Year 2015, the Director of the Department of Health may issue HIV prevention grants for a combination of HIV prevention interventions that include:

(A)

HIV screening;

(B)

Harm reduction;

(C)

Social network HIV screening;

(D)

Partner services;

(E)

Faith-based initiatives;

(F)

Youth peer education; and

(G)

Other health-education services for adolescents and older adults.

(3)

For the purposes of this subsection, the term “faith-based initiative” means a program to encourage and support places of worship in delivering HIV prevention messages that promote safe-sex practices, educate people about HIV, and promote HIV screening.

(4)

In Fiscal Year 2015, the Director of the Department of Health shall issue a competitive grant totaling $480,000 to a qualified community-based nonprofit corporation or organization for the creation of a comprehensive concussion care protocol for children.

(f)

For Fiscal Year 2015, the Director of the Department of Health may issue grants to qualified community organizations to provide:

(1)

Clinical nutritional home delivery services for individuals living with cancer and other life-threatening diseases;

(2)

Ambulatory health services;

(3)

Poison control hotline and prevention education services;

(4)

Operations and primary care services for school-based health clinics; and

(5)

A teen pregnancy prevention program.

(g)

(1)

All grants issued pursuant to subsections (e) and (f) of this section shall be administered pursuant to the requirements set forth in part B of subchapter XII-A of Chapter 3 of Title 1 [§ 1-328.11 et seq.].

(2)

The Department of Health shall submit a quarterly report to the Secretary to the Council on all grants issued pursuant to the authority granted in subsections (e) and (f) of this section.

(h)

(1)

For Fiscal Year 2016, the Director of the Department of Health shall have the authority to issue grants to qualified community organizations for the purpose of providing the following services:

(A)

Programs designed to promote healthy development in girls attending public and chartered schools in grades 8-12 located in areas of the city possessing the highest rates of teen pregnancy and highest enrollment in state-funded health programs in the District, not to exceed $569,000;

(B)

Clinical nutritional home delivery services for individuals living with cancer and other life-threatening diseases, not to exceed $150,000; and

(C)

Programs designed to support teen peer educators who work to provide sexual health information and condoms to youth, not to exceed $157,000.

(2)

All grants issued pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be administered pursuant to the requirements set forth in part B of subchapter XII-A of Chapter 3 of Title 1 [§ 1-328.11 et seq.].

(3)

The Department of Health shall submit a quarterly report to the Secretary to the Council on all grants issued pursuant to the authority granted in paragraph (1) of this subsection.

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 4907a
as added Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 5011, 57 DCR 181
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 5062, 60 DCR 12472
June 26, 2014, D.C. Law 20-117, § 6, 61 DCR 2032
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 5012(a), 61 DCR 9990
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 5042, 62 DCR 10905

Short title: Section 5010 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle B of title V of the act may be cited as the “Department of Health Grant Authority Amendment Act of 2009”.

Section 5061 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle G of Title V of the act may be cited as the “Department of Health Functions Clarification Amendment Act of 2013”.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-117: Section 18 of D.C. Law provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5042 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5012(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5012(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5012(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see §§ 2 and 3 of the Department of Health Grant-Making Authority for Clinical Nutritional Home Services Emergency Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-217, November 20, 2013, 60 DCR 16524, 20 STAT 2607).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5062 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5062 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Dept. of Health Grant Making Authority Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-53, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6386, 20 DCSTAT 1401).
For temporary addition of (c), see § 2 of (D.C. Act 19-503, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 12759), applicable October 11, 2012.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Department of Health Functions Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-391, July 13, 2012, 59 DCR 8501).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Department of Health Functions Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-258, December 21, 2011, 58 DCR 11226).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Department of Health Functions Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-601, November 17, 2010, 57 DCR 11037).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5011 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5011 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Department of Health Grant-Making Authority for Clinical Nutritional Home Services Temporary Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Law 20-70, February 22, 2014, 61 DCR 24).
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Department of Health Grant-Making Authority Temporary Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Law 20-10, July 13, 2013, 60 DCR 7234, 20 DCSTAT 1755).
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 19-197 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
“(E) ‘Partner services’ means public-health intervention performed by disease- intervention specialists who follow up with a person newly diagnosed with a sexually transmitted disease to share information on persons who may have been exposed to the same infection with which the patient has been diagnosed.”
“(D) ‘HIV’ means human immunodeficiency virus.
“(C) ‘Harm reduction’ means a model of behavior change that proposes an incremental approach to reduce the harm posed by certain behavior that can be applied to substance abuse or HIV.
“(B) ‘Faith-based initiative’ means a program to engage places of worship in delivering HIV prevention messages that promote safe-sex practices, educate people about HIV, and promote HIV screening.
“(A) ‘AIDS’ means acquired immune deficiency syndrome.
“(2) For the purposes of this subsection, the term:
“(G) Other health-education services for adolescents and older adults.
“(F) Youth peer education; and
“(E) Faith-based initiatives;
“(D) Partner services;
“(C) Social network HIV screening;
“(B) Harm reduction;
“(A) HIV screening;
“(c)(1) For fiscal year 2012, the Director of the Department of Health shall have the authority to issue grants to existing District of Columbia HIV prevention programs in the amount of $331,000 for a combination of HIV prevention interventions that include HIV screening in clinical and non-clinical settings, as well as effective behavioral approaches critical in the fight against HIV/AIDS and, through fiscal year 2014, HIV prevention grants in the amount of $1.2 million for a combination of HIV prevention interventions that include:
Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-197 added subsection (c) to read as follows:
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 18-304 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 2 of D.C. Law 18-304 amended subsec. (a) to read as follows: “(a) For fiscal years 2011 through 2014, the Director of the Department of Health shall have the authority to issue grants to Unity Health Care, Incorporated, for the purposes of conducting health promotion, preventing disease, and providing health-care services.”; and repealed subsec. (b).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 added (h).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 added (e), (f), and (g).
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-117 rewrote (c)(1) and (d)(2).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 added (c) and (d).